Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201981-5,190
Act, how cited.

Sections 81-5,190 to 81-5,209 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Amusement Ride Act.

Laws 1987, LB 226, § 1;

Laws 1994, LB 608, § 1;

R.S.1943, (2010), § 48-1801;

Laws 2019, LB301, § 26.
July 1, 2019